Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-305
Plowing up road; penalty.

Any person who plows up or upon any public highway without the consent or direction of the road overseer or the officer in charge of road work in the area where such road is located shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1899, c. 58, §§ 1, 2, p. 285;

R.S.1913, § 3032;

C.S.1922, § 2783;

C.S.1929, § 39-1018;

R.S.1943, § 39-706;

Laws 1959, c. 181, § 7, p. 656;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-706;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 29.